Colorado, session 2026A, SB120.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-33.5-416.3 as
follows:
24-33.5-416.3. Missing persons alert training program -
requirements.
(1) A PERSON SEEKING CERTIFICATION, OR RENEWAL OF AN EXPIRED
CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-31-305 (1.7), BY THE PEACE
OFFICERS STANDARDS AND TRAINING BOARD PURSUANT TO PART 3 OF
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

ARTICLE 31 OF THIS TITLE 24 SHALL UNDERGO THE TRAINING RELATED TO
MISSING PERSONS ALERTS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE A TRAINING PROGRAM FOR
PEACE OFFICERS DESCRIBING THE STATE ALERTS RELATING TO MISSING
PERSONS, INCLUDING MISSING PERSON ALERTS PURSUANT TO SECTIONS
16-2.7-103, 24-33.5-415.7, 24-33.5-415.8, 24-33.5-415.9, AND 24-33.5-431,
AND THE STATE EMERGENCY ALERT SYSTEM. PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-31-319 (3), THE PEACE OFFICERS STANDARDS AND TRAINING BOARD
SHALL INCLUDE THE TRAINING PROGRAM IN THE BASIC OR RESERVE PEACE
OFFICER TRAINING CURRICULUM AND TRAINING REQUIRED TO RENEW A
PEACE OFFICER CERTIFICATION THAT EXPIRED. THE DEPARTMENT IS NOT
REQUIRED TO DELIVER OR ADMINISTER THE TRAINING REQUIRED PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-319, add (3) as
follows:
24-31-319. Training related to missing indigenous persons -
development - missing persons alerts training.
(3) THE P.O.S.T. BOARD SHALL INCLUDE IN THE BASIC OR RESERVE
PEACE OFFICER TRAINING CURRICULUM, AND THE TRAINING REQUIRED TO
RENEW A PEACE OFFICER CERTIFICATION THAT EXPIRED, TRAINING
CONCERNING MISSING PERSONS ALERTS CREATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-416.3.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-5-141, add (5) as
follows:
23-5-141. Campus police information sharing - missing student
notifications to law enforcement - legislative declaration - rules -
definitions.
(5) (a) IF A STUDENT, FAMILY MEMBER, LEGAL GUARDIAN, FACULTY
MEMBER, OR OTHER PERSON REPORTS TO AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT A STUDENT ATTENDING THE INSTITUTION, WHO WAS LAST
KNOWN TO RESIDE IN THE STATE, IS MISSING OR CANNOT BE LOCATED, THE
INSTITUTION SHALL EITHER IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY LAW ENFORCEMENT
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION WITHOUT CONDUCTING
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-120

A PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT OR CONDUCT A PRELIMINARY
WELLNESS ASSESSMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS SECTION
AND DOCUMENT THE INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5)(f) OF THIS
SECTION.
(b) IF AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION CONDUCTING A
PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT DOES NOT LOCATE THE STUDENT
WITHIN SIX HOURS AFTER RECEIVING THE REPORT, THE INSTITUTION SHALL,
AT THE EXPIRATION OF THE SIX-HOUR PERIOD, NOTIFY THE INSTITUTION'S
POLICE DEPARTMENT. IF THE INSTITUTION DOES NOT CONDUCT A
PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT OR AT ANY TIME DETERMINES THERE
IS CREDIBLE EVIDENCE OF RISK TO THE STUDENT'S SAFETY, THE INSTITUTION
SHALL IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY THE INSTITUTION'S POLICE DEPARTMENT. IF THE
INSTITUTION DOES NOT HAVE ITS OWN POLICE DEPARTMENT, THE
INSTITUTION SHALL MAKE THE NOTIFICATION REQUIRED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(5)(b) TO THE NEAREST LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH JURISDICTION
OVER THE STUDENT'S CURRENT LOCAL ADDRESS ON FILE WITH THE
INSTITUTION, OR, IF NO CURRENT LOCAL ADDRESS IS ON FILE, THE STUDENT'S
PERMANENT ADDRESS ON FILE WITH THE INSTITUTION. AFTER RECEIVING THE
MISSING PERSON REPORT, THE INSTITUTION'S POLICE DEPARTMENT OR
NEAREST LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL FOLLOW THE REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 16-2.7-102 AND 16-2.7-103, AND
ANY OTHER APPLICABLE PROCEDURE.
(c) (I) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AND AN EMPLOYEE
THEREOF, IS IMMUNE FROM CIVIL LIABILITY RELATED TO A MISSING STUDENT
IF THE INSTITUTION OR EMPLOYEE THEREOF WAS ACTING IN GOOD FAITH
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5).
(II) GOOD FAITH IMMUNITY FOR PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (5)(c) APPLIES IN ADDITION TO ANY IMMUNITY PURSUANT
TO THE "COLORADO GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY ACT", ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE
24. GOOD FAITH IMMUNITY PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(c) APPLIES
INDEPENDENTLY TO A PRIVATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(III) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION CLAIMING GOOD FAITH
IMMUNITY PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(c) BEARS THE BURDEN OF
ESTABLISHING THAT THE INSTITUTION INITIATED THE MINIMUM WELLNESS
ASSESSMENT STEPS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS
SECTION, WHICH MAY BE ESTABLISHED BY DOCUMENTATION MAINTAINED
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-120

PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(f) OF THIS SECTION.
(d) (I) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (5), A PRELIMINARY
WELLNESS ASSESSMENT INCLUDES, AT A MINIMUM, THE FOLLOWING STEPS
CONDUCTED IN GOOD FAITH AND DOCUMENTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(5)(f) OF THIS SECTION:
(A) A DIGITAL CONTACT ATTEMPT;
(B) A RESIDENTIAL VERIFICATION, IF THE INSTITUTION HAS
INSTITUTION-CONTROLLED HOUSING; AND
(C) AN ACADEMIC AND SOCIAL INQUIRY.
(II) IF AN INSTITUTION CONDUCTS A PRELIMINARY WELLNESS
ASSESSMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5) AND DOES NOT LOCATE THE
STUDENT WITHIN SIX HOURS, THE INSTITUTION MUST CONDUCT AN
EMERGENCY CONTACT ATTEMPT.
(III) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY CONDUCT THE
STEPS LISTED IN SUBSECTION (5)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION SIMULTANEOUSLY IF
THE INSTITUTION DEEMS IT NECESSARY.
(IV) THIS SUBSECTION (5)(d) DOES NOT PREVENT AN INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION FROM ESTABLISHING ADDITIONAL PRELIMINARY
WELLNESS ASSESSMENT STEPS.
(V) (A) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IS NOT DEEMED TO
HAVE FAILED TO CONDUCT A PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT SOLELY
BECAUSE, DUE TO CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE INSTITUTION'S REASONABLE
CONTROL, ONE OR MORE OF STEPS OF THE PRELIMINARY WELLNESS
ASSESSMENT COULD NOT BE COMPLETED WITHIN THE SIX-HOUR PERIOD
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL DOCUMENT THE
REASON FOR EACH UNCOMPLETED STEP REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(5)(f) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) (I) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL ADOPT AND
PUBLISH A PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT POLICY THAT DEFINES, AT
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-120

A MINIMUM:
(A) THE CATEGORIES OF INSTITUTIONAL EMPLOYEES OR AGENTS WHO
ARE AUTHORIZED TO CONDUCT A RESIDENTIAL VERIFICATION PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(d)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION, WHICH MUST INCLUDE AT LEAST
ONE CATEGORY OF EMPLOYEE OR AGENT AVAILABLE OUTSIDE OF REGULAR
BUSINESS HOURS;
(B) THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S PROCESS FOR
ESCALATING A MISSING PERSON REPORT TO AN EMPLOYEE RESPONSIBLE FOR
INITIATING A PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT;
(C) THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S RECORD-KEEPING
SYSTEM REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(f) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(D) ADDITIONAL PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT STEPS AS
ESTABLISHED BY AN INSTITUTION.
(II) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL MAKE ITS
PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT POLICY PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE
INSTITUTION'S WEBSITE AND SHALL REVIEW AND UPDATE THE POLICY AT
LEAST ONCE EVERY THREE YEARS.
(f) (I) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT CONDUCTS A
PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL MAINTAIN CONTEMPORANEOUS WRITTEN
DOCUMENTATION OF THE ASSESSMENT, INCLUDING:
(A) THE DATE AND TIME THE MISSING PERSON REPORT WAS RECEIVED
AND THE NAME AND ROLE OF THE EMPLOYEE WHO RECEIVED IT;
(B) THE DATE, TIME, METHOD, AND OUTCOME OF EACH CONTACT
ATTEMPT MADE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION;
(C) THE NAME AND ROLE OF EACH INSTITUTIONAL EMPLOYEE OR
AGENT WHO PARTICIPATED IN THE PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT;
(D) THE REASON ANY STEP OF THE PRELIMINARY WELLNESS
ASSESSMENT WAS NOT COMPLETED WITHIN THE SIX-HOUR PERIOD REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION, IF APPLICABLE; AND
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-120

(E) THE DATE AND TIME A MISSING PERSON REPORT IS MADE TO THE
INSTITUTION'S POLICE DEPARTMENT OR THE NEAREST LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY.
(II) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL RETAIN THE
RECORDS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(f) FOR A MINIMUM
OF THREE YEARS AFTER THE MISSING PERSON REPORT WAS RECEIVED BY THE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AND THE RECORDS MUST BE AVAILABLE
TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY UPON REQUEST.
(III) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL MAKE THE
RECORDS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(f) AVAILABLE UPON
REQUEST, CONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE STUDENT
PRIVACY LAWS, TO THE PERSON DESIGNATED BY THE STUDENT AS THE
STUDENT'S EMERGENCY CONTACT IN THE STUDENT'S OFFICIAL
INSTITUTIONAL RECORD IF THE STUDENT HAS NOT BEEN LOCATED WITHIN
THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE INSTITUTION RECEIVES A MISSING PERSON REPORT.
THE PERMISSIBLE DISCLOSURE MUST BE MADE SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF
INFORMING THE STUDENT'S EMERGENCY CONTACT OF THE INSTITUTION'S
EFFORTS TO LOCATE THE STUDENT.
(g) (I) CONDUCTING A PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS SECTION IS A PERMISSIBLE
DISCLOSURE CONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE STUDENT
PRIVACY LAWS, LIMITED TO INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY TO
LOCATE THE STUDENT, AND DOES NOT CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF A STATE
STUDENT PRIVACY LAW.
(II) A DISCLOSURE MADE AS PART OF A PRELIMINARY WELLNESS
ASSESSMENT MUST BE LIMITED TO INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY
TO LOCATE THE STUDENT AND MUST NOT BE USED FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE.
(h) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5), UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(I) "ACADEMIC AND SOCIAL INQUIRY" MEANS A QUERY BY AN
INSTITUTION OF AVAILABLE FACULTY MEMBERS AND RESIDENTIAL STAFF
ABOUT THE STUDENT'S MOST RECENTLY KNOWN ATTENDANCE, LIMITED TO
INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY TO DETERMINE THE STUDENT'S
LOCATION, CONSISTENT WITH THE PERMISSIBLE DISCLOSURE PROVISIONS OF
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-120

SUBSECTION (5)(g) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) "CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE INSTITUTION'S REASONABLE
CONTROL" MEANS AN UNFORESEEABLE SITUATION, OR A SITUATION THE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IS UNABLE TO ADEQUATELY RESPOND
TO, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO:
(A) THE UNAVAILABILITY OF FACULTY OR STAFF OUTSIDE OF
REGULAR BUSINESS HOURS;
(B) THE STUDENT'S RESIDENCE BEING LOCATED OFF CAMPUS OR
OUTSIDE THE INSTITUTION'S PHYSICAL JURISDICTION; AND
(C) AN INCORRECT, DISCONNECTED, OR UNANSWERED EMERGENCY
CONTACT.
(III) "DIGITAL CONTACT ATTEMPT" MEANS AN ATTEMPT BY THE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO CONTACT THE STUDENT THROUGH
ALL INSTITUTION-PROVIDED COMMUNICATIONS AVAILABLE TO THE
INSTITUTION, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, AN INSTITUTIONAL EMAIL,
STUDENT PORTAL SYSTEM, AND ANY PERSONAL CONTACT INFORMATION THE
STUDENT HAS PROVIDED TO THE INSTITUTION FOR EMERGENCY NOTIFICATION
PURPOSES.
(IV) "EMERGENCY CONTACT ATTEMPT" MEANS AN ATTEMPT BY THE
INSTITUTION TO REACH THE STUDENT'S EMERGENCY CONTACT PERSON
LISTED IN THE STUDENT'S OFFICIAL INSTITUTIONAL RECORD.
(V) "INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION" OR "INSTITUTION" MEANS
A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
23-18-102 (10)(a); A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
23-71-102 (1)(a); AN AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
23-60-103 (1); A PRIVATE COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
23-2-102; AND A PRIVATE OCCUPATIONAL SCHOOL, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
23-2-102.
(VI) "REGULAR BUSINESS HOURS" MEANS THE HOURS DURING WHICH
THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICES ARE
REGULARLY OPEN FOR BUSINESS, AS PUBLISHED IN THE INSTITUTION'S
OFFICIAL ACADEMIC CALENDAR.
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-120

(VII) "RESIDENTIAL VERIFICATION" MEANS A PHYSICAL CHECK OF
THE STUDENT'S RESIDENCE IF THE STUDENT RESIDES IN
INSTITUTION-CONTROLLED HOUSING BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE
OF THE INSTITUTION, AS DEFINED BY THE INSTITUTION'S PUBLISHED
PRELIMINARY WELLNESS ASSESSMENT POLICY REQUIRED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(e) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-120

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-120